Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB80.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The General Assembly hereby recognizes and reaffirms that the right to
keep and bear arms is a natural, God-given right that is recognized by the
Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Kentucky.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to stand as a bulwark against any
future federal or state infringement of the inherent and inalienable right to
keep and bear arms.
(2) As used in this section, "federal firearm restriction" means any provision of the:
(a) National Firearms Act, 26 U.S.C. sec. 5801 et seq., as amended;
(b) Gun Control Act, 18 U.S.C. sec. 921 et seq., as amended; or
(c) Firearms Owners' Protection Act, Pub. L. No. 99-308.
(3) This section shall become effective immediately upon, and to the extent permitted
by:
(a) The repeal by the United States Congress of; or
(b) Any decision of the Supreme Court of the United States, the United States
Court of Appeals for the Sixth Circuit, or other federal court with the
authority to enforce an order against the Commonwealth which declares
unconstitutional;
a federal firearm restriction, and shall apply with respect to a federal firearm
restriction that is no longer in effect.
(4) A federal firearm restriction that is repealed or declared unconstitutional shall
have no force or effect in the Commonwealth. The Commonwealth and its
departments, commissions, agencies, and political subdivisions shall not enact or
enforce any law, rule, or regulation that mirrors, replaces, or imposes a
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1246
restriction similar to that federal firearm restriction.
(5) (a) A person shall not be prosecuted, fined, or otherwise subject to other
penalties or enforcement action for any activity that was regulated or
prohibited by a federal firearm restriction that is repealed or declared
unconstitutional.
(b) A law enforcement agency, law enforcement officer, employee of a law
enforcement agency, public agency, public official, employee of a public
agency, or employee of a local government shall not enforce, assist in the
enforcement of, or otherwise cooperate in the enforcement of a federal
firearm restriction that is repealed or declared unconstitutional.
(c) A person aggrieved by a violation of this subsection may file a civil action
against any person or organization responsible for the violation in a court
of competent jurisdiction for compensatory damages, punitive damages,
costs, and attorney's fees.
(d) Sovereign, governmental, and qualified immunity, including but not limited
to immunity under the Eleventh Amendment to the Constitution of the
United States, are waived to the extent of liability created under this
subsection.
(6) (a) A person commits an offense under subsection (5)(b) of this section when,
while acting in his or her official capacity under color of law, he or she
knowingly violates subsection (5)(b) of this section.
(b) A person who knowingly commits an offense under subsection (5)(b) of this
section shall be subject to a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars
($250) and termination from employment to the extent allowable under state
law.
(7) A manufacturer of firearms or federally licensed firearms dealer has the right to
manufacture, sell, or possess firearms and accessories that are no longer
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1246
restricted under federal law.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:30 PM Jacketed